Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-769
Section of statutes; not correlated; reconcilable; Revisor of Statutes; duties.

When one section of the statutes is amended in two or more bills in the same session of the Legislature and has not been correlated as a part of the normal legislative process and the amendments are entirely reconcilable and not in conflict with each other, it shall be the duty of the Revisor of Statutes to correlate them so as to reflect all such amendments and to cause the result to be published in the statutory supplement followed by a brief note explaining the action taken.

Laws 1979, LB 70, § 1.